Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 3A. Fire Hazards and Dangerous Substances

§ 2799.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Explosive material” includes “explosives,” “explosive material,” “blasting agents,” and “detonators,” as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 841, as amended, and regulations promulgated pursuant to that section.

“Flammable material” means, in addition to its ordinary meaning, motion picture film.

“Hazardous material” means any substance having such properties that it may spontaneously or acting under the influence of any thing contiguous or of any chemical or physical agency ignite or generate flammable or explosive vapors or gases to a dangerous extent.

“Petroleum product” includes liquid petroleum gas, explosive flammable gases, and flammable fluids, compounds, or tablets, derived in whole or in part from petroleum.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 2005; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 173.

§ 2800.
Rules and standards.

The Commissioner may adopt rules and standards for explosion prevention, fire prevention, and public safety with respect to the safekeeping, storage, use, manufacturing, sale, handling, transportation, and other disposition of explosive materials, flammable materials, hazardous materials, petroleum, and petroleum products. The Commissioner may prescribe the location, materials, and construction of buildings and other facilities to be used for these purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 2005.

§ 2801.
Seizure of materials.

Without warrant, the Commissioner, a member of the State Police, a sheriff, a deputy sheriff, a police officer, or a constable may seize materials held by a person in violation of rules adopted under this subchapter and hold the same subject to the order of the court taking jurisdiction of the offense.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 2005.

§ 2802.
Orders.

After an inspection, the Commissioner may issue an appropriate order to remove or abate a condition dangerous to persons or property involving explosive materials, flammable materials, or hazardous materials. This order shall be served on the owner or occupant of the premises on which the condition exists.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 2005.